Washington statutes.
RCW 19.154.065

Immigration-related services not prohibited.

Persons who are not licensed to practice law in this state or who are not otherwise permitted to represent others under federal law in an immigration matter may engage in the following services for compensation:

(1) Translate words on a government form that the person seeking services presents to the person providing translation services;

(2) Secure existing documents for the person seeking services. Existing documents include, for example, birth and marriage certificates; and

(3) Offer other immigration-related services that are not prohibited under this chapter or any other provision of law or do not constitute the practice of law.

[ 2011 c 244 s 4.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2011 c 244: See note following RCW 19.154.010.